Alabama, session 2026rs, SB215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 34-14A-19, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§34-14A-19
(a) Prior to the commencement of residential home
building by a residential home builder, the residential home
builder shall disclose in writing to the homeowner whether the
residential home builder has obtained and is currently
maintaining liability insurance. The written disclosure
requirement may be satisfied as an incorporated provision
within the original contract or as a separate addendum.
(b)(1) If the disclosure is that the residential home
builder has obtained and is currently maintaining liability
insurance, the incorporated provision may be signed or
initialed, electronically or otherwise, by the residential
home builder and the homeowner without the signature of a
witness.
(2) If the disclosure is that the residential home
builder has not obtained or does not currently maintain
liability insurance, then The the written disclosure shall be
Page 1

liability insurance, then The the written disclosure shall be
SB215 Enrolled
signed by the residential home builder and the homeowner, and
attested by one witness selected by the homeowner.
(c) Failure of a residential home builder to comply
with this section is a violation of this chapter and
punishable by the board pursuant to Section 34-14A-8."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB215 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB215
Senate 12-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 17-Mar-26




By: Senator Melson
Page 3